test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-kinakiyi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kinakíyi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, liver AEW NA1
     kinakíni+NI+Sg: kinakíni
     kinakíni+NI+Pl: kinakíistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Non: kinakíní

     kinakíni+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: nohkinákini
     kinakíni+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: nohkinákiistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Px1Sg+Non: nohkinákini

     kinakíni+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: nohkinákinnaani
     kinakíni+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: nohkinákinnaanistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Px1Pl+Non: nohkinákinnaani

     kinakíni+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: kohkinákinnooni
     kinakíni+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: kohkinákinnoonistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Px21Pl+Non: kohkinákinnooni

     kinakíni+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: kohkinákini
     kinakíni+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: kohkinákiistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Px2Sg+Non: kohkinákini

     kinakíni+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: kohkinákinoaawayi
     kinakíni+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: kohkinákinoaawaistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Px2Pl+Non: kohkinákinoaawai

     kinakíni+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: ohkinákini
     kinakíni+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: ohkinákiistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Px3Sg+Non: ohkinákini

     kinakíni+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: ohkinákinoaawayi
     kinakíni+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: ohkinákinoaawaistsi
     kinakíni+NI+Px3Pl+Non: ohkinákinoaawai  
